District of Columbia statutes.
31-3835

Prohibitions.

An individual or group health plan which is a health benefit plan, and a health insurer offering health care coverage, shall not:

(1)

Deny a patient eligibility, or continued eligibility, to enroll or renew coverage under terms of the health benefit plan, solely for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this chapter; or

(2)

Penalize or otherwise reduce or limit the reimbursement of an attending provider, or provide incentives (monetary or otherwise) to an attending provider, to induce such provider to provide care to an individual participant or beneficiary in a manner inconsistent with this chapter.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-254, § 6, 48 DCR 723